Utah statutes.
53-7-309.   Classification of applicants and licensees.
(1)  To administer this part, the board shall classify all applicants and
licensees as follows:
(a)  Class 1: a licensed dealer who:
(i)  is engaged in the business of installing gas appliances or systems for
the use of LPG;
(ii)  sells, fills, refills, delivers, or is permitted to deliver any LPG; or
(iii)  is involved under both Subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii).
(b)  Class 2: a business engaged in the sale, transportation, and exchange of
cylinders, or engaged in more than one of these, but not transporting or
transferring gas in liquid.
(c)  Class 3: a business not engaged in the sale of LPG, but engaged in the
sale and installation of gas appliances or LPG systems.
(d)  Class 4: those businesses not specifically within classification 1, 2, or
3 may at the discretion of the board be issued special licenses.
(2) (a)  Any license granted under this section entitles the licensee to
operate a staffed plant or facility consistent with the license at one
location, which is stated in the license, under Section 53-7-310.
(b)  For each additional staffed plant or facility owned or operated by the
licensee, the licensee shall register the additional location with the board
and pay an additional annual fee, to be set in accordance with Section
53-7-314.
